Utah statutes.
9-10-101.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Uintah Basin Revitalization Fund Board.
(2)  "Capital projects" means expenditures for land, improvements on the land,
and equipment intended to have long-term beneficial use.
(3)  "County" means:
(a)  Duchesne County; or
(b)  Uintah County.
(4)  "Division" means the Division of Housing and Community Development.
(5)  "Revitalization Fund" means the Uintah Basin Revitalization Fund.
(6)  "Tribe" means the Ute Indian Tribe of the Uintah and Ouray Reservation.
